Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325M.31, is amended to read: 325M.31 DEFINITIONS. (a) For purposes of sections 325M.30 to deleted text begin 325M.34deleted text end new text begin 325M.36new text end , the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Accessible user interface" means a way for a user to input data, make a choice, or take an action on a social media platform in two clicks or fewer. (c) "Account holder" means a natural person or legal person who holds an account or profile with a social media platform. (d) "Account interactions" means any action that a user can make within a social media platform that could have a negative impact on another account holder. Account interactions include but are not limited to: (1) sending messages or invitations to users; (2) reporting users; (3) commenting on, resharing, liking, voting, or otherwise reacting to users' user-generated content; and (4) posting user-generated content or disseminating user-generated content to users. Actions that have no impact on other users, including viewing user-generated content or public content, are not account interactions. (e) "Algorithmic ranking system" means a computational process, including one derived from algorithmic decision making, machine learning, statistical analysis, or other data processing or artificial intelligence techniques, used to determine the selection, order, relative prioritization, or relative prominence of content from a set of information that is provided to a user on a social media platform, including search results ranking, content recommendations, content display, or any other automated content selection method. (f) "Conspicuously" means the information is presented in a manner, given the information's size, color, contrast, location, and proximity to any related information, as to be readily noticed and understood by a reasonable user. (g) "Content" means any media, including but not limited to written posts, images, visual or audio recordings, notifications, and games, that a user views, reads, watches, listens to, or otherwise interacts or engages with on a social media platform. Content includes other account holders' accounts or profiles when recommended to a user by the social media platform. (h) "Engage" or "engagement" means a user's utilization of the social media platform. (i) "Expressed preferences" means a freely given, considered, specific, and unambiguous indication of a user's preferences regarding the user's engagement with a social media platform. Expressed preferences must not be based on the user's time spent engaging with content on the social media platform or on the use of features that do not indicate explicit preference, including comments made, posts reshared, or similar actions that may be taken on content the user perceives to be of low quality. Expressed preferences must not be obtained through a user interface designed or manipulated with the substantial effect of subverting or impairing a user's decision making. (j) "Social media platform" means an electronic medium, including a browser-based or application-based interactive computer service, Internet website, telephone network, or data network, that allows an account holder to create, share, and view user-generated content for a substantial purpose of social interaction, sharing user-generated content, or personal networking. Social media platform does not include: (1) an Internet search provider; (2) an Internet service provider; (3) an email service; (4) a streaming service, online video game, e-commerce, or other Internet website where the content is not user generated but where interactive functions enable chat, comments, reviews, or other interactive functionality that is incidental to, directly related to, or dependent upon providing the content; (5) a communication service, including text, audio, or video communication technology, provided by a business to the business's employees and clients for use in the course of business activities and not for public distribution, except that social media platform includes a communication service provided by a social media platform; (6) an advertising network with the sole function of delivering commercial content; (7) a telecommunications carrier, as defined in United States Code, title 47, section 153; (8) a broadband service, as defined in section 116J.39, subdivision 1; (9) single-purpose community groups for education or public safety; (10) teleconferencing or video-conferencing services that allow reception and transmission of audio and video signals for real-time communication, except that social media platform includes teleconferencing or video-conferencing services provided by a social media platform; (11) cloud computing services, which may include cloud storage and shared document collaboration; (12) providing or obtaining technical support for a platform, product, or service; or (13) a platform designed primarily and specifically for creative professional users, as distinct from the general public, to share their portfolio and creative content, engage in professional networking, acquire clients, and market the creative professional user's creative content and creative services through facilitated transactions. (k) "Time sensitive" means content that is welcomed under a user's expressed preferences and that has significantly reduced value to the user with the passing of time. (l) "User" means a natural person who is located in Minnesota and who holds an account or profile with a social media platform. (m) "User-generated content" means any content created by an account holder that is uploaded, posted, shared, or disseminated on the social media platform. Sec. 2. new text begin [325M.36] SOCIAL MEDIA BEHAVIORAL THREAT ASSESSMENT AND REPORTING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Educational facility" means a child care center, a school, or any postsecondary education institution located in this state. new text end new text begin (c) "Religious institution" has the meaning given in section 327.30, subdivision 1, paragraph (f), when located in this state, as well as affiliated facilities including homes, schools, or buildings operated by a religious institution when located in this state. new text end new text begin (d) "Targeted violence" means a deliberate act of violence directed at a specific person, group, or location, regardless of motivation, that violates criminal laws of the United States or the state of Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Social media behavioral threat assessment and reporting; requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A social media platform must provide continuous review of user-generated content in order to identify and report to the Minnesota Fusion Center (MNFC) articulable threats of targeted violence directed at: new text end new text begin (1) an educational facility; or new text end new text begin (2) a religious institution. new text end new text begin Articulable threats of targeted violence must be reported regardless of the background or motivation of the user who generated the content. new text end new text begin (b) A social media platform may utilize user reporting and technological tools, including algorithms and artificial intelligence to assist in reviewing user-generated content in order to identify articulable threats of targeted violence, but must use humans to review the content to identify articulable threats of targeted violence and use humans to assess the content to determine if the content needs to be reported under this section. new text end new text begin (c) The social media platform must report an articulable threat of targeted violence based on the requirements under this section and must follow the reporting requests of the MNFC to facilitate the transmission of threat information, files, personal information, and other data. The MNFC must accommodate the requests of a social media platform to accept information as required by this section that conserves resources and reduces costs when practicable. new text end new text begin (d) The MNFC must designate one or more persons to specialize in social media platform threat assessments to coordinate reports for social media platforms and facilitate reporting required under this section. new text end new text begin (e) Nothing in this section prevents a social media platform from any other reporting normally done in the course of business or as required by law, including contacting local, state, national law enforcement, school safety centers, or other facilities or individuals. new text end new text begin (f) A social media platform must report to the MNFC an articulable threat of targeted violence within 24 hours of the discovery of the articulable threat of targeted violence, unless there is an indication from the content that a person may act on an articulable threat of targeted violence within 24 hours of the date the content was posted. The social media platform must immediately report to the MNFC through any practicable means of communication. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Threat assessment; factors. new text end new text begin In determining whether to report to the MNFC an articulable threat of targeted violence, a social media platform must consider factors including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) violent ideation, including general and specific depictions, fantasies, or desires for murder or violence; new text end new text begin (2) evidence of concerning levels of interest in violent topics, content, or groups who support violence or past incidents of targeted violence; new text end new text begin (3) evidence of aggressive violent behavior, including user-generated content that depicts domestic violence, animal cruelty, assault, harassment, or stalking; new text end new text begin (4) direct threats made using a social media platform communication feature; new text end new text begin (5) speech communicating desperation or despair that clearly indicates a potential for harm to self or others or a warning to others of an impending harm to self or others; new text end new text begin (6) fixations or stalking, including a preoccupation for a person, place, belief, or cause that indicates a threat to an individual, group of persons, or a specific location; and new text end new text begin (7) speech that indicates training or preparation for targeted violence, including the use of weapons or other materials associated with targeted violence. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin (a) If a social media platform violates this section, the attorney general may bring an enforcement action under paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) The attorney general may bring an enforcement action against a social media platform to enforce a provision of this section in accordance with section 8.31. If the state prevails in an action to enforce this section, the state may, in addition to penalties provided by paragraph (c) or other remedies provided by law, be allowed an amount determined by the court to be the reasonable value of all or part of the state's litigation expenses incurred. new text end new text begin (c) Any social media platform that violates this section is subject to an injunction and any other equitable relief, and is liable for a civil penalty of not more than $1,000,000 for each violation. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Data practices. new text end new text begin The MNFC, along with the agency that carries on a law enforcement function that subsequently obtains information from a social media platform, must treat the data as criminal investigative data under section 13.82, subdivision 7. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Free speech. new text end new text begin Outside the investigation of an articulable threat of targeted violence, including a true threat or an incitement to imminent lawless action, nothing in this section allows law enforcement, or another agent of the government, to violate the protected free speech rights of an individual otherwise guaranteed by the Minnesota Constitution or the United States Constitution. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Immunity from liability. new text end new text begin This section does not create a unique cause of action for an individual. A social media platform that uses currently available technology and follows the requirements of this section is not liable to an individual or any persons for the criminal actions of another based on the requirements or standards in this section. new text end